Utah statutes.
31A-26-302.   Settlement of claims in credit life and accident and health
insurance.
(1)  The creditor shall promptly report all claims to the insurer or its
designated claim representative.  The insurer shall maintain adequate claims
files.  All claims shall be settled as soon as possible in accordance with the
terms of the insurance contract.
(2)  The insurer shall pay all claims either by draft drawn upon the insurer
or by check of the insurer to the order of the claimant to whom payment of the
claim is due pursuant to the policy provisions, or upon direction of that
claimant to another.
(3) A person other than the insurer or its designated claim representative may
not settle or adjust claims.  The creditor may not be designated as a claims
representative.
